District of Columbia statutes.
28-3304

Action to recover usury paid.

If a person or corporation in the District directly or indirectly takes or receives a greater amount of interest than is declared by this chapter to be lawful, whether in advance or not, the person or corporation paying the same may within one year after the date of payment sue for and recover the amount of the unlawful interest so paid.

History

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 676, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28-3304.
1973 Ed., § 28-3304.